Utah statutes.
20A-1-605.   Mutilating certificate of nomination -- Forging declination or resignation -- Tampering with ballots.

(1)  It is unlawful for any person to:

(a)  falsely mark or willfully deface or destroy:

(i)  any certificate of nomination or any part of a certificate of nomination; or

(ii)  any letter of declination or resignation;

(b)  file any certificate of nomination or letter of declination or resignation knowing it, or any part of it, to be falsely made;

(c)  suppress any certificate of nomination, or letter of declination or resignation, or any part of a certificate of nomination or letter of declination or resignation that has been legally filed;

(d)  forge any letter of declination or resignation;

(e)  falsely make the official endorsement on any ballot;

(f)  willfully destroy or deface any ballot;

(g)  willfully delay the delivery of any ballots;

(h)  examine any ballot offered or cast at the polls or found in any ballot box for any purpose other than to determine which candidate was elected; and

(i)  make or place any mark or device on any ballot in order to determine the name of any person for whom the elector has voted.

(2)  In addition to the penalties established in Section 20A-1-609, any person convicted of any of the offenses established by this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

